District of Columbia statutes.
1-204.24f

Definitions.

For purposes of this part —

(1)

the term “Authority” means the District of Columbia Financial Responsibility and Management Assistance Authority established under § 47-391.01(a);

(2)

the term “control year” has the meaning given such term under § 47-393(4); and

(3)

the term “District government” has the meaning given such term under § 47-393(5).

History

Dec. 24, 1973, 87 Stat. 774, Pub. L. 93-198, § 424(f)
as added Apr. 17, 1995, 109 Stat. 142, Pub. L. 104-8, § 302(a)
redesignated § 424(e), Nov. 22, 2000, 114 Stat. 2440, Pub. L. 106-522, § 155(b)(2)(C)
restored as § 424(f), Oct. 16, 2006, 120 Stat. 2036, Pub. L. 109-356, § 201(a)

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-204.24b.

Effect of Amendments

Pub. L. 109-356 rewrote the section which had previously read:
“§ 1-204.24f. Definitions.
“In this part:
“(1) the term ‘Authority’ means the District of Columbia Financial Responsibility and Management Assistance Authority established under § 47-391.01(a);
“(2) the term ‘control year’ has the meaning given such term under § 47-393(4); and
“(3) the term ‘District government’ has the meaning given such term under § 47-393(5).”